Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-414
Prohibited acts; penalty.

A person who, without authorization, knowingly obtains, conceals, damages, or destroys the coding, disk, certificate, card, software, file, password, program, or hardware enabling an online notary public to affix an official electronic signature or online notary seal shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2019, LB186, § 14.